Massachusetts, session 194th, H5513.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Richard
Kassiotis, a police officer of the town of Middleton, may continue to serve in such position until
reaching age 67, the date of his retirement or the date he is relieved of his duties, whichever
occurs first; provided, however, that he is mentally and physically capable of performing the
duties of a police officer. The select board may, at the town's own expense, require that Richard
Kassiotis be examined annually by a physician designated by the select board, to determine such
physical and mental capability to perform the duties of his office.
No further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of Richard Kassiotis,
pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws, for service after his reaching age 65. Upon
retirement for superannuation, he shall receive a superannuation retirement allowance equal to
the allowance to which he would have been entitled had he retired upon reaching age 65.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2